Louisiana, session 2026, HB1195.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 4:64, 65(C)(introductory paragraph), 82, 82.2, and 422(D) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 4:82.3 and 422(E) and (F) are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§64. Rules and regulations
The commission may make rules and regulations governing all boxing,
mixed technique events, and wrestling contests or exhibitions under its jurisdiction,
the sale of tickets at such those contests or exhibitions, the promoters of such those
contests or exhibitions, and the contestants, their seconds and managers in such those
contests or exhibitions, and all other rules and regulations as the commission, in its
discretion, deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this Chapter. Should any
case occur which may not be covered in this Chapter or by the rules and regulations
of the commission, it shall be determined by the commission, but only insofar as
such determination is consistent with justice, the best interests of boxing, mixed
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1195 ENROLLED
technique event, and wrestling and with the powers and authority granted by this
Chapter. A copy of the pertinent rules and regulations of the commission shall be
furnished to the contestants or their managers in contests or exhibitions subject to the
jurisdiction of the commission. No such contest or exhibition shall be conducted,
held, or given except in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter and the rules
and regulations of the commission, including but not limited to any official rules for
sports not specifically mentioned in this Chapter that require commission approval
or sanctioning, provided that no such boxing contest or exhibition shall exceed
twenty twelve rounds.
§65. Licenses; fees; bond
* * *
C. The commission may for cause, and after a hearing, revoke or suspend
any license issued under in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter, or may
fine the holder of such license the sum of not more than one five thousand dollars,
or both, for any of the following reasons:
* * *
§82. Noncompliance with Chapter; penalty
Whoever conducts, promotes, or in any manner participates in any boxing,
mixed technique event, or wrestling contest or exhibition without first complying
with the provisions of this Chapter shall be fined not more than five hundred
thousand dollars.
* * *
§82.2. Noncompliance with Chapter; injunction
A. In addition to the actions and penalties otherwise provided for by this
Chapter, the commission may cause to issue in any court of competent jurisdiction
an injunction without bond enjoining any person from violating or continuing to
violate the provisions of this Chapter. In addition to or in lieu of the criminal
penalties or administrative remedies or sanctions provided in this Chapter or
administrative rules, the commission may issue an order to any licensee or other
person or entity engaged in any activity, conduct, or practice in violation of this
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1195 ENROLLED
Chapter or those rules, directing that person or entity to immediately cease and desist
from that activity, conduct, or practice. This order shall be issued in the name of the
state, under the official seal of the commission.
B. In the suit for an injunction, the commission may demand of the
defendant reasonable attorney fees and court costs. If the person or entity to whom
the commission directs a cease and desist order does not cease and desist the
prohibited activity, conduct, or practice within three business days of receipt of that
order, the commission, through its proper officer or agent, may seek and cause to
issue in any court of competent jurisdiction and venue a writ of injunction, including
a temporary restraining order, enjoining that person or entity from engaging in the
prohibited activity, conduct, or practice.
C. The judgment for attorney fees and court costs may be rendered in the
same judgment in which the injunction is made absolute. If the commission brings
an action against an individual pursuant hereto and fails to prove its case, then it
shall be liable to such person for the payment of his attorney fees and costs. In a suit
for an injunction, the commission may demand of the defendant reasonable attorney
fees, associated investigative and administrative expenses, and costs of court. The
judgment for attorney fees, expenses, and costs may be rendered in the same
judgment in which the injunction is made absolute.
D.(1) Upon a proper showing by the commission that a person or entity has
engaged in any activity, conduct, or practice prohibited by this Chapter or
commission rule, the court shall issue a temporary restraining order enjoining that
person or entity from engaging in that unlawful activity, conduct, or practice pending
a hearing on a preliminary injunction, and, in due course, a permanent injunction
shall be issued after a hearing, commanding the cessation of that unlawful activity,
conduct, or practice complained of, without the necessity of the commission giving
bond as ordinarily required in such cases.
(2) A temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent
injunction issued pursuant to this Section shall not be released upon bond.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1195 ENROLLED
E. The trial of the proceeding for injunction shall be summary and by the
judge without a jury.
§82.3. Disciplinary actions
A. After due notice and hearing in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act, the commission may refuse to issue a license to any applicant, or may
refuse to renew the license of any person, or may restrict, suspend, or revoke any
license upon proof that the person has done any of the following:
(1) Violated the provisions of this Chapter or the rules of the commission.
(2) Attempted to obtain, or obtained, a license by fraud or misrepresentation.
B. Any action of the commission taken pursuant to this Section is subject to
notice requirements and hearing, adjudication, and appeal proceedings pursuant to
the rules adopted by the commission in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act.
C. Refusal to grant a license for failure to pass the licensing examination
required by the commission shall not require notice or a hearing.
D. If the commission prevails in its disciplinary action, it is entitled to
reimbursement of the costs associated with that disciplinary proceeding, including
the cost of investigators, stenographers, attorney fees, and other reasonably
associated costs which shall be part of the consent order or commission decision
issued in that proceeding.
* * *
§422. Registration of agents
* * *
D. To produce sufficient revenue to offset the expenses incurred by the
division in administering this Chapter, an annual registration fee of one hundred
dollars shall be paid. application for registration or renewal of registration of an
athlete agent pursuant to this Chapter shall be accompanied by the appropriate
registration fee as follows:
(1) One thousand dollars for an initial application for registration.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1195 ENROLLED
(2) Five hundred dollars for a registration based on a certificate of
registration issued by another state.
(3) One thousand dollars for renewal of a registration.
(4) Five hundred dollars for renewal of registration based on a certificate of
registration issued by another state.
E. The registration or renewal of registration is valid for two years. Renewal
of the registration may be made by the filing of an application for renewal.
F. All funds received from the payment of the registration fees imposed and
collected pursuant to the provisions of this Section shall be deposited into the
Department of Justice Legal Support Fund pursuant to R.S. 49:259.
Section 2. R.S. 4:422(C) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.